Illinois, session 104th, HB1129.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Ultrasound Opportunity Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds as follows:8        (1) Ultrasound requirements serve an essential medical 9    purpose in confirming the presence, location, and 10    gestational age of a pregnancy. 11        (2) Ultrasound requirements also serve an essential 12    medical purpose in diagnosing ectopic pregnancies, which, 13    if left undiagnosed, can result in infertility or even 14    fatal blood loss. 15        (3) Furthermore, it is critical to the psychological 16    and physical well-being of a woman considering an abortion 17    that she receive complete and accurate information on the 18    reality and status of her pregnancy and of her unborn 19    child. 20        (4) The decision to abort "is an important, and often 21    a stressful one, and it is desirable and imperative that 22    it be made with full knowledge of its nature and 23    consequences". Planned Parenthood v. Danforth, 428 U.S.   HB1129- 2 -LRB104 03620 BDA 13644 b1    52, 67 (1976). 2    (b) Based on the findings in subsection (a), the purposes 3of this Act are to: 4        (1) protect the physical health and welfare of every 5    woman considering an abortion; 6        (2) ensure that every woman considering an abortion 7    receive complete information on the reality and status of 8    her pregnancy and of her unborn child and that every woman 9    submitting to an abortion do so only after giving her 10    voluntary and informed consent to the abortion procedure; 11        (3) protect the unborn child from a woman's uninformed 12    decision to have an abortion; and13        (4) reduce "the risk that a woman may elect an 14    abortion, only to discover later, with devastating 15    psychological consequences, that her decision was not 16    fully informed". Planned Parenthood v. Casey, 505 U.S. 17    833, 882 (1992). 18    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    "Abortion" means the use of any instrument, medicine, 20drug, or any other substance or device to terminate the 21pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant with an intention 22other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to 23preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, or 24to remove a dead fetus.25    "Medical emergency" means a condition that, on the basis   HB1129- 3 -LRB104 03620 BDA 13644 b1of the physician's good faith clinical judgment, so 2complicates the medical condition of a pregnant woman as to 3necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy to avert 4her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of 5substantial and irreversible impairment of major bodily 6function.7    "Physician" means any person licensed to practice medicine 8in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.9    "Qualified person" means a person having documented 10evidence that he or she has completed a course in the operation 11of ultrasound equipment and is in compliance with any other 12requirements of law regarding the operation of ultrasound 13equipment. 14    Section 15. Offer of ultrasound required.15    (a) At any facility where abortions are performed, the 16physician who is to perform the abortion, the referring 17physician, or another qualified person working in conjunction 18with either physician shall offer any woman seeking an 19abortion after 8 weeks of gestation an opportunity to receive 20and view an active ultrasound of her unborn child by someone 21qualified to perform ultrasounds at the facility, or at a 22facility listed in a listing of local ultrasound providers 23provided by the facility, prior to the woman having any part of 24an abortion performed or induced, and prior to the 25administration of any anesthesia or medication in preparation   HB1129- 4 -LRB104 03620 BDA 13644 b1for the abortion. 2    (b) The ultrasound shall be performed by a qualified 3person or persons. The active ultrasound image must be of a 4quality consistent with standard medical practice. The woman's 5response to the offer must be documented by the facility, 6including the date and time of the offer and the woman's 7signature attesting to her informed decision to accept or 8decline the offer. 9    Section 20. Medical emergency. The requirements under this 10Act shall not apply when, in the medical judgment of the 11physician performing or inducing the abortion based on the 12particular facts of the case before him or her, there exists a 13medical emergency.  14    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 15severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.